Hawaii statutes.
[§461J-12.5] Inactive status. (a) A
licensee may apply in writing to have the licensee's license placed on inactive
status. While on inactive status, the licensee shall not engage in the
practice of physical therapy.

(b) A license on inactive status shall be
renewed during the same time period as active licenses. While on inactive
status, the licensee shall not be required to comply with the continuing
competence requirements in this chapter.

(c) To reactivate a license on inactive
status, the licensee shall:

(1) Pay the renewal and any applicable fees; and

(2) Have obtained continuing competence units
equivalent to that required for a single renewal period of an active license
within the last two years prior to applying to restore the license to active
status.

(d) The inactive status of any licensee shall
not deprive the board of its authority to institute or continue any
disciplinary or enforcement action against the licensee. [L 2013, c 35, pt of
§1]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next